New York, session 2025-2026, A8251.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 214 of the town law, as amended by chapter 344 of 2 the laws of 2005, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 214. Oaths, undertakings and compensation of commissioners. Each 4 commissioner, before entering upon the duties of [his] such commission- 5 er's office, shall take the constitutional oath of office and execute to 6 the town and file with the town clerk an official undertaking in such 7 sum and with such sureties as the town board may direct. The town board 8 at any time may require any such commissioners to file a new official 9 undertaking for such sum and with such sureties as the board shall 10 approve. Such commissioners may be paid such an amount as the town board 11 may designate, but not to exceed the sum of one hundred twenty dollars 12 per day each for each day actually and necessarily spent in the service 13 of the district. Such compensation shall be deemed an expense of main- 14 taining the district. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10977-01-5